Maryland, session 2026, HB0358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–204.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale by:
(5) an elementary or secondary school in the State or a nonprofit
parent–teacher organization or other nonprofit organization within an elementary or
secondary school in the State for the sale of magazine subscriptions in a fund–raising
campaign, if the net proceeds are used solely for the educational benefit of the school or its
students, including a sale resulting from an agreement or contract with an organization to
– 1 –

Ch. 186 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
participate in a fund–raising campaign for a percentage of the gross receipts under which
students act as agents or salespersons for the organization by selling or taking orders for
the sale;
(6) a parent–teacher organization or other organization within an
elementary or secondary school in the State or within a school system in the State;
(7) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a bona fide church, religious
organization, or other nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code if:
(i) the sale is made at an auction sale; and
(ii) the proceeds of the sale are used to carry on the exempt purposes
of the church or organization; [or]
(8) a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code that maintains a memorial on property that is owned by the State
if the proceeds of the sale are used to maintain a memorial on property that is owned by
the State; OR
(9) AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE OR A
NONPROFIT PARENT–TEACHER ORGANIZATION OR OTHER NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION WITHIN AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE IF
THE SALE IS MADE AT A BOOK FAIR HELD IN–PERSON ON THE PREMISES OF THE
SCHOOL AND THE NET PROCEEDS ARE USED SOLELY FOR THE EDUCATIONAL
BENEFIT OF THE SCHOOL OR ITS STUDENTS, INCLUDING A SALE RESULTING FROM
AN AGREEMENT OR A CONTRACT WITH AN ORGANIZATION TO PARTICIPATE IN A
BOOK FAIR FOR A PERCENTAGE OF THE GROSS RECEIPTS UNDER WHICH STUDENTS,
TEACHERS, SCHOOL STAFF, OR MEMBERS OF THE
PARENT–TEACHER ORGANIZATION OR OTHER NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION WITHIN
AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL ACT AS AGENTS OR SALESPERSONS FOR
THE THIRD–PARTY VENDOR BY MANAGING THE BOOK FAIR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –